District of Columbia statutes.
2-1403.11

Hearing tribunal.

(a)

After a complaint has been noticed for hearing, a hearing tribunal consisting of 3 members of the Commission, sitting as the Commission, shall be appointed to make a determination upon such complaint. At the discretion of the Commission, 1 or more hearing examiners may be delegated to hear and report back to the Commission, on any case or question before the Commission.

(b)

A hearing examiner may be an employee of the District government or may be selected from a list of qualified hearing examiners prepared by the Commission. Commission members may serve as hearing examiners. Hearing examiners shall be paid on a per diem basis, while actually sitting and hearing a case: Provided, that funds are available for such purpose.

History

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title III, § 311, 24 DCR 6038

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2551.
1973 Ed., § 6-2291.